Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.40.080

Bonds—Form, terms, and maturity.

In addition to any other authority granted by law, a code city shall have authority to ratify and fund indebtedness as provided by chapter 35.40 RCW; to issue revenue bonds, coupons and warrants as authorized by chapter 35.41 RCW; to authorize and issue local improvement bonds and warrants, installment notes and interest certificates as authorized by chapter 35.45 RCW; to fund indebtedness and to issue other bonds as authorized by chapters 39.44, 39.48, 39.52 RCW, RCW 39.56.020, and 39.56.030 in accordance with the procedures and subject to the limitations therein provided.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.40.080.]